North Carolina statutes. Chapter 118. Firemen’s and Rescue Squad Workers’ Relief and Pension Fund. [Repealed]
§§ 118-1 through 118-66.
[Repealed]

Recodified as Articles 84 to 88 of Chapter 58.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter has been recodified as Articles 84 to 88 of Chapter 58 under the authority of Session Laws 1987, c. 752, s. 9 and Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 975, s. 34.

Sections 118-18 to 118-32 had been recodified as G.S. 118-33 to 118-49 pursuant to Session Laws 1981, c. 1029, s. 1. Sections 118-52 to 118-59 had been reserved.